Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Seven Million Seven
Hundred Sixty-two Thousand Four Dollars ($7,762,004.00) shall be
used to replace funding no longer available due to the reduction of
federal matching dollars.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department shall maintain the
funding levels for senior nutrition programs from the fiscal year

ending June 30, 2025. The Oklahoma Legislature requires joint
approval from the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate
and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives before any
senior nutrition sites may be closed due to declining attendance or
increased operational costs during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to the funding required in Section 2 of
this act, from the funds appropriated to the Department of Human
Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Two Million Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) shall be used to make permanent the
second meal per day for the ADvantage Waiver Program.
SECTION 4. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department shall maintain the
funding levels for provider rates and service authorizations for the
Community, Homeward Bound, In-Home Supports Waiver for Adults, In-
Home Supports Waiver for Children, and ADvantage Waivers from the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature for the support of the Developmental
Disability Services Division, in addition to services provided in
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the agency may also budget for
and expend funds for family and self-advocate onboarding meetings
and services, professional development for case management,
expansion of crisis services, and enhancements to intake processes
for the purpose of ensuring a stronger, more responsive service
delivery system for Oklahomans with developmental disabilities.
SECTION 6. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department of Human Services
shall transfer Five Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars
($5,600,000.00) to the credit of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Account established in Section 1-9-103 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes, which shall be distributed according to Section 1-9-104 of
Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1137 Page 2

SECTION 7. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services all federal monies received by the state during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families Block Grant and the Child Care and Development Block
Grant to meet the provisions of federal law relating to such grants.
SECTION 8. The Director of Human Services may request through
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services the
early transfer by the Oklahoma Tax Commission of tax collections to
the General Revenue Fund for the purpose of early allocation to the
Department’s disbursing funds to alleviate cash-flow problems.
SECTION 9. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer monies appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services disbursing
funds in the amounts and ratios requested by the agency except that
the cumulative amount transferred shall not exceed the cumulative
amount of equal monthly allotments of the appropriations from the
General Revenue Fund.
B. Monies appropriated or collected for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, may be transferred to these disbursing funds for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to satisfy encumbrances and
obligations of the fiscal year, provided that monies equal in amount
are transferred from appropriations or collections for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025, to the disbursing funds for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, to satisfy encumbrances and obligations
of the fiscal year. All transfer requests shall be in writing to
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
C. The Department of Human Services shall maintain records of
such inter-year transfers.
SECTION 10. The Director of Human Services may request the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to
transfer monies between the Department of Human Services Support
Service Providers Grant Program Fund and the Human Services
Disbursing Fund or the Human Services Medical and Assistance Fund,
as needed for the expenditure of funds.
SECTION 11. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1137 Page 3

SECTION 12. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1137 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1137 Page 5